Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.047

Stock of small business investment companies regulated by United States.

A savings bank may purchase and hold for its own investment account stock in small business investment companies licensed and regulated by the United States, as authorized by the Small Business Act, Public Law 85-536, 72 Statutes at Large 384, in an amount not to exceed one percent of the guaranty fund of such mutual savings bank.

[ 1959 c 185 s 2.]